test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_2syll_ud_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - pákkuđ: # MLO, checked
    pákkuđ+V+Inf: pákkuđ
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pááhum
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: pááhuh
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pákku
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: pákkoon
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: pákkuvettee
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: pákkuv
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: pákkup
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pákkuvetteđ
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pákkuh
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pakkum
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: pakkuh
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pááhui
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: páhhoim
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: páhhoid
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: páhhoin
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: pááhuim
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: pááhuid
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pakkuu
    pákkuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: páhuččim
    pákkuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: páhuččih
    pákkuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: páhuččij
    pákkuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: páhuččáim
    pákkuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: páhuččáid
    pákkuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: páhuččáin
    pákkuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: páhuččijm
    pákkuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: páhuččijd
    pákkuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: páhuččii
    pákkuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: pákkoom
    pákkuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: pákkooh
    pákkuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: pááhuš
    pákkuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: páhužeen
    pákkuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: pááhušvettee
    pákkuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: páhužává
    pákkuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: páhužep
    pákkuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: pááhušvetteđ
    pákkuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: páhužeh

    pákkuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: pááhu
    pákkuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: pááhus
    pákkuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: pákkoon
    pákkuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: pákkoo
    pákkuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: pákkus
    pákkuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: pákkup
    pákkuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: pákkuđ
    pákkuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: pákkus
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: pááhu
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: pákkum
    pákkuđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: páhuččii
    pákkuđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: pakkuu
    pákkuđ+V+PrsPrc: pákkoo
    pákkuđ+V+PrfPrc: pákkum
    pákkuđ+V+Actio+Nom: pákkum
    pákkuđ+V+Actio+Ess: pákkumin
    pákkuđ+V+Actio+Loc: pákkumist
    pákkuđ+V+Actio+Ill: pákkumân
    pákkuđ+V+Actio+Com: páhudijn
    pákkuđ+V+VAbess: páhuhánnáá

  Verb - čuárvuđ: # MLO checked
    čuárvuđ+V+Inf: čuárvuđ
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuárvum
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: čuárvuh
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuárvu
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čuárvoon
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: čuárvuvettee
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: čuárvuv
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: čuárvup
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: čuárvuvetteđ
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čuárvuh
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čuorvum
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: čuorvuh
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čuárvui
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: čuárvoim
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: čuárvoid
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: čuárvoin
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: čuárvuim
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: čuárvuid
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čuorvuu
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: čuárvuččim 
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: čuárvuččih
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: čuárvuččij
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: čuárvuččáim
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: čuárvuččáid
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: čuárvuččáin
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: čuárvuččijm
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: čuárvuččijd
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: čuárvuččii
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: čuárvoom
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: čuárvooh
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: čuárvuš
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: čuárvužeen
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: čuárvušvettee
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: čuárvužává
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: čuárvužep
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: čuárvušvetteđ
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: čuárvužeh

    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: čuárvu
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: čuárvus
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: čuárvoon
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: čuárvoo
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: čuárvus
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: čuárvup
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: čuárvuđ
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: čuárvus
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čuárvu
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: čuárvum
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: čuárvuččii
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: čuorvuu
    čuárvuđ+V+PrsPrc: čuárvoo
    čuárvuđ+V+PrfPrc: čuárvum
    čuárvuđ+V+Actio+Nom: čuárvum
    čuárvuđ+V+Actio+Ess: čuárvumin
    čuárvuđ+V+Actio+Loc: čuárvumist
    čuárvuđ+V+Actio+Ill: čuárvumân
    čuárvuđ+V+Actio+Com: čuárvudijn
    čuárvuđ+V+VAbess: čuárvuhánnáá
#    čuárvuđ+V+VAbess: čuárvuhinnáá
#    čuárvuđ+V+VAbess: čuárvuhennáá
